Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-310 Filing requirements for
advertising. (a) Every issuer of medicare supplement insurance policies
or certificates in this State shall file a copy of any medicare supplement
advertisement intended for use in this State whether through written, radio, or
television medium to the commissioner for review. The commissioner may require
a certification from the entity that to the best of the certifier's knowledge
and belief the advertisement complies with the provisions of this chapter and
all applicable rules.

(b) If the commissioner finds the
advertisement to be in violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule,
the commissioner shall order the issuer to cease and desist use of the
advertisement pursuant to section 431:2-203.

(c) In conjunction with a cease and desist
order issued pursuant to subsection (b), the commissioner may order the issuer
to refund to the insured the premium paid for the medicare supplement policy.
Any refund of an amount paid by the insured for the medicare supplement
insurance shall be paid within fifteen days to the person entitled thereto;
provided that by rule the commissioner may prescribe an amount below which no
refund need be made. [L 1989, c 195, §3; am L 1990, c 84, §9; am L 1992, c 195,
§9; am L 2004, c 122, §36]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next